Illinois, session 104th, HB1135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 677 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/77 new)8    Sec. 77. Choate Mental Health and Developmental Center. 9The Department shall permit any resident of the Clyde L. 10Choate Mental Health and Developmental Center at Anna to 11remain at the facility upon request of the resident or the 12resident's family or legal guardian if the resident maintains 13an Illinois home in a county located within the geographically 14organized service region designated by the Department as 15Division of Mental Health Region 5, excluding the following 16counties: Madison, Bond, Fayette, Clay, Jasper, or Crawford.